test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-u_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - táiđu:
    táiđu+N+Sg+Nom:  táiđu
    táiđu+N+Sg+Gen:  tááiđu
    táiđu+N+Sg+Ill:  tááiđun
    táiđu+N+Sg+Loc:  tááiđust
    táiđu+N+Sg+Com:  táiđoin
    táiđu+N+Sg+Abe:  táiđuttáá
    táiđu+N+Ess:  táiđun
    táiđu+N+Pl+Nom:  tááiđuh
    táiđu+N+Pl+Gen: [tááiđui, táiđui]
    táiđu+N+Pl+Acc:  tááiđuid
    táiđu+N+Pl+Ill:  táiđoid
    táiđu+N+Pl+Loc:  tááiđuin
    táiđu+N+Pl+Com:  táiđuiguin
    táiđu+N+Pl+Abe:  táiđuittáá

  Noun - uáinu:
    uáinu+N+Sg+Nom:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Gen:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Ill:  Uáinun
    uáinu+N+Sg+Loc:  uáinust
    uáinu+N+Sg+Com:  uáinoin
    uáinu+N+Sg+Abe:  uáinuttáá
    uáinu+N+Ess:  uáinun
    uáinu+N+Pl+Nom:  uáinuh
    uáinu+N+Pl+Gen: [uáinui, uáinui]
    uáinu+N+Pl+Acc:  uáinuid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Ill:  uáinoid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Loc:  uáinuin
    uáinu+N+Pl+Com:  uáinuiguin
    uáinu+N+Pl+Abe:  uáinuittáá

  Noun - suáittu:
    suáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  suáittu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  suáitun
    suáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  suáitust
    suáittu+N+Sg+Com:  suáittoin
    suáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  suáituttáá
    suáittu+N+Ess:  suáittun
    suáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  suáituh
    suáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [suáitui, suáitui]
    suáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  suáituid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  suáittoid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  suáituin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Com:  suáituiguin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  suáituittáá

  Noun - vuáittu:
    vuáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáittu
    vuáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáitu
    vuáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáitun
    vuáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáitust
    vuáittu+N+Sg+Com:  vuáittoin
    vuáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáituttáá
    vuáittu+N+Ess:  vuáittun
    vuáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáituh
    vuáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [vuáitui, vuáitui]
    vuáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáituid
    vuáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáittoid
    vuáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáituin
    vuáittu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáituiguin
    vuáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáituittáá

  Noun - kuáivu:
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáivun
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuáivust
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Com:  kuáivoin
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáivuttáá
    kuáivu+N+Ess:  kuáivun
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuáivuh
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Gen: [kuáivui, kuáivui]
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuáivuid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáivoid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuáivuin
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Com:  kuáivuiguin
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáivuittáá

  Noun - tuáivu:
    tuáivu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáivu
    tuáivu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuáivu
    tuáivu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuáivun
    tuáivu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuáivust
    tuáivu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáivoin
    tuáivu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáivuttáá
    tuáivu+N+Ess:  tuáivun
    tuáivu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáivuh
    tuáivu+N+Pl+Gen: [tuáivui, tuáivui]
    tuáivu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáivuid
    tuáivu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáivoid
    tuáivu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáivuin
    tuáivu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáivuiguin
    tuáivu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáivuittáá

  Noun - áimu:
    áimu+N+Sg+Nom:  áimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááimun
    áimu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááimust
    áimu+N+Sg+Com:  áimoin
    áimu+N+Sg+Abe:  áimuttáá
    áimu+N+Ess:  áimun
    áimu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááimuh
    áimu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááimui, áimui]
    áimu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááimuid
    áimu+N+Pl+Ill:  áimoid
    áimu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááimuin
    áimu+N+Pl+Com:  áimuiguin
    áimu+N+Pl+Abe:  áimuittáá

  Noun - kiäinu:
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäinun
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäinust
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Com:  kiäinoin
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäinuttáá
    kiäinu+N+Ess:  kiäinun
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäinuh
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Gen: [kiäinui, kiäinui]
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäinuid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäinoid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäinuin
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Com:  kiäinuiguin
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Abe:  kÄäinuittáá

  Noun - torttu:
    torttu+N+Sg+Nom:  torttu
    torttu+N+Sg+Gen:  toortu
    torttu+N+Sg+Ill:  toortun
    torttu+N+Sg+Loc:  toortust
    torttu+N+Sg+Com:  torttuin
    torttu+N+Sg+Abe:  tortuttáá
    torttu+N+Ess:  torttun
    torttu+N+Pl+Nom:  toortuh
    torttu+N+Pl+Gen: [toortui, tortui]
    torttu+N+Pl+Acc:  toortuid
    torttu+N+Pl+Ill:  torttuid
    torttu+N+Pl+Loc:  toortuin
    torttu+N+Pl+Com:  tortuiguin
    torttu+N+Pl+Abe:  tortuittáá

  Noun - rumbu:
    rumbu+N+Sg+Nom:  rumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruumbun
    rumbu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruumbust
    rumbu+N+Sg+Com:  rumbuin
    rumbu+N+Sg+Abe:  rumbuttáá
    rumbu+N+Ess:  rumbun
    rumbu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruumbuh
    rumbu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruumbui, rumbui]
    rumbu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruumbuid
    rumbu+N+Pl+Ill:  rumbuid
    rumbu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruumbuin
    rumbu+N+Pl+Com:  rumbuguin
    rumbu+N+Pl+Abe:  rumbuittáá

  Noun - pumppu:
    pumppu+N+Sg+Nom:  pumppu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Gen:  puumpu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Ill:  puumpun
    pumppu+N+Sg+Loc:  puumpust
    pumppu+N+Sg+Com:  pumppuin
    pumppu+N+Sg+Abe:  pumputtáá
    pumppu+N+Ess:  pumppun
    pumppu+N+Pl+Nom:  puumpuh
    pumppu+N+Pl+Gen: [puumpui, pumpui]
    pumppu+N+Pl+Acc:  puumpuid
    pumppu+N+Pl+Ill:  pumppuid
    pumppu+N+Pl+Loc:  puumpuin
    pumppu+N+Pl+Com:  pumpuiguin
    pumppu+N+Pl+Abe:  pumpuittáá

  Noun - ruvdu:
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruuvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuvdun
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruuvdust
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Com:  ruvduin
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruvduttáá
    ruvdu+N+Ess:  ruvdun
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruuvduh
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuvdui, ruvdui]
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuvduid
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruvduid
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuvduin
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Com:  ruvduiguin
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruvduittáá

  Noun - luumu:
    luumu+N+Sg+Nom:  luumu
    luumu+N+Sg+Gen:  luumu
    luumu+N+Sg+Ill:  luumun
    luumu+N+Sg+Loc:  luumust
    luumu+N+Sg+Com:  luumuin
    luumu+N+Sg+Abe:  luumuttáá
    luumu+N+Ess:  luumun
    luumu+N+Pl+Nom:  luumuh
    luumu+N+Pl+Gen:  luumui
    luumu+N+Pl+Acc:  luumuid
    luumu+N+Pl+Ill:  luumuid
    luumu+N+Pl+Loc:  luumuin
    luumu+N+Pl+Com:  luumuiguin
    luumu+N+Pl+Abe:  luumuittáá

  Noun - ruusu:
    ruusu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruusun
    ruusu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruusust
    ruusu+N+Sg+Com:  ruusuin
    ruusu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruusuttáá
    ruusu+N+Ess:  ruusun
    ruusu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruusuh
    ruusu+N+Pl+Gen:  ruusui
    ruusu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruusuid
    ruusu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruusuid
    ruusu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruusuin
    ruusu+N+Pl+Com:  ruusuiguin
    ruusu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruusuittáá

  Noun - tárbu:
    tárbu+N+Sg+Nom:  tárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Gen:  táárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Ill:  táárbun
    tárbu+N+Sg+Loc:  táárbust
    tárbu+N+Sg+Com:  tárboin
    tárbu+N+Sg+Abe:  tárbuttáá
    tárbu+N+Ess:  tárbun
    tárbu+N+Pl+Nom:  táárbuh
    tárbu+N+Pl+Gen: [táárbui, tárbui]
    tárbu+N+Pl+Acc:  táárbuid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Ill:  tárboid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Loc:  táárbuin
    tárbu+N+Pl+Com:  tárbuiguin
    tárbu+N+Pl+Abe:  tárbuittáá

  Noun - láddu:
    láddu+N+Sg+Nom:  láddu
    láddu+N+Sg+Gen:  láádu
    láddu+N+Sg+Ill:  láádun
    láddu+N+Sg+Loc:  láádust
    láddu+N+Sg+Com:  láddoin
    láddu+N+Sg+Abe:  láduttáá
    láddu+N+Ess:  láddun
    láddu+N+Pl+Nom:  lááduh
    láddu+N+Pl+Gen: [láádui, ládui]
    láddu+N+Pl+Acc:  lááduid
    láddu+N+Pl+Ill:  láddoid
    láddu+N+Pl+Loc:  lááduin
    láddu+N+Pl+Com:  láduiguin
    láddu+N+Pl+Abe:  láduittáá

  Noun - váddu:
    váddu+N+Sg+Nom:  váddu
    váddu+N+Sg+Gen:  váádu
    váddu+N+Sg+Ill:  váádun
    váddu+N+Sg+Loc:  váádust
    váddu+N+Sg+Com:  váddoin
    váddu+N+Sg+Abe:  váduttáá
    váddu+N+Ess:  váddun
    váddu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááduh
    váddu+N+Pl+Gen: [váádui, vádui]
    váddu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááduid
    váddu+N+Pl+Ill:  váddoid
    váddu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááduin
    váddu+N+Pl+Com:  váduiguin
    váddu+N+Pl+Abe:  vÀduittáá

  Noun - áldu:
    áldu+N+Sg+Nom:  áldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááldun
    áldu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááldust
    áldu+N+Sg+Com:  áldoin
    áldu+N+Sg+Abe:  álduttáá
    áldu+N+Ess:  áldun
    áldu+N+Pl+Nom:  áálduh
    áldu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááldui, áldui]
    áldu+N+Pl+Acc:  áálduid
    áldu+N+Pl+Ill:  áldoid
    áldu+N+Pl+Loc:  áálduin
    áldu+N+Pl+Com:  álduiguin
    áldu+N+Pl+Abe:  álduittáá

  Noun - rávdu:
    rávdu+N+Sg+Nom:  rávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávdun
    rávdu+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávdust
    rávdu+N+Sg+Com:  rávdoin
    rávdu+N+Sg+Abe:  rávduttáá
    rávdu+N+Ess:  rávdun
    rávdu+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávduh
    rávdu+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávdui, rávdui]
    rávdu+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávduid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Ill:  rávdoid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávduin
    rávdu+N+Pl+Com:  rávduiguin
    rávdu+N+Pl+Abe:  rávduittáá

  Noun - nággu:
    nággu+N+Sg+Nom:  nággu
    nággu+N+Sg+Gen:  náágu
    nággu+N+Sg+Ill:  náágun
    nággu+N+Sg+Loc:  náágust
    nággu+N+Sg+Com:  nággoin
    nággu+N+Sg+Abe:  náguttáá
    nággu+N+Ess:  nággun
    nággu+N+Pl+Nom:  nááguh
    nággu+N+Pl+Gen: [náágui, nágui]
    nággu+N+Pl+Acc:  nááguid
    nággu+N+Pl+Ill:  nággoid
    nággu+N+Pl+Loc:  nááguin
    nággu+N+Pl+Com:  náguiguin
    nággu+N+Pl+Abe:  náguittáá

  Noun - kálgu:
    kálgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálgun
    kálgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálgust
    kálgu+N+Sg+Com:  kálgoin
    kálgu+N+Sg+Abe:  kálguttáá
    kálgu+N+Ess:  kálgun
    kálgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káálguh
    kálgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálgui, kálgui]
    kálgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káálguid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálgoid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káálguin
    kálgu+N+Pl+Com:  kálguiguin
    kálgu+N+Pl+Abe:  kálguittáá

  Noun - kárgu:
    kárgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káárgun
    kárgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káárgust
    kárgu+N+Sg+Com:  kárgoin
    kárgu+N+Sg+Abe:  kárguttáá
    kárgu+N+Ess:  kárgun
    kárgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káárguh
    kárgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káárgui, kárgui]
    kárgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káárguid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kárgoid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káárguin
    kárgu+N+Pl+Com:  kárguiguin
    kárgu+N+Pl+Abe:  kárguittáá

  Noun - ávju:
    ávju+N+Sg+Nom:  ávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Gen:  áávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Ill:  áávjun
    ávju+N+Sg+Loc:  áávjust
    ávju+N+Sg+Com:  ávjoin
    ávju+N+Sg+Abe:  ávjuttáá
    ávju+N+Ess:  ávjun
    ávju+N+Pl+Nom:  áávjun
    ávju+N+Pl+Gen: [áávjui, ávjui]
    ávju+N+Pl+Acc:  áávjuid
    ávju+N+Pl+Ill:  ávjoid
    ávju+N+Pl+Loc:  áávjuin
    ávju+N+Pl+Com:  ávjuiguin
    ávju+N+Pl+Abe:  ávjuittáá

  Noun - árppu:
    árppu+N+Sg+Nom:  árppu
    árppu+N+Sg+Gen:  áárpu
    árppu+N+Sg+Ill:  áárpun
    árppu+N+Sg+Loc:  áárpust
    árppu+N+Sg+Com:  árppoin
    árppu+N+Sg+Abe:  árputtáá
    árppu+N+Ess:  árppun
    árppu+N+Pl+Nom:  áárpuh
    árppu+N+Pl+Gen: [áárpui, árpui]
    árppu+N+Pl+Acc:  áárpuid
    árppu+N+Pl+Ill:  árppoid
    árppu+N+Pl+Loc:  áárpuin
    árppu+N+Pl+Com:  árpuiguin
    árppu+N+Pl+Abe:  árpuittáá

  Noun - párkku:
    párkku+N+Sg+Nom:  párkku
    párkku+N+Sg+Gen:  páárhu
    párkku+N+Sg+Ill:  páárkun
    párkku+N+Sg+Loc:  páárhust
    párkku+N+Sg+Com:  párhoin
    párkku+N+Sg+Abe:  párhuttáá
    párkku+N+Ess:  párkkun
    párkku+N+Pl+Nom:  páárhuh
    párkku+N+Pl+Gen: [páárhui, párhui]
    párkku+N+Pl+Acc:  páárhuid
    párkku+N+Pl+Ill:  párhoid
    párkku+N+Pl+Loc:  páárhuin
    párkku+N+Pl+Com:  párhuiguin
    párkku+N+Pl+Abe:  párhuittáá

  Noun - ákku:
    ákku+N+Sg+Nom:  ákku
    ákku+N+Sg+Gen:  ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Ill:  áákun
    ákku+N+Sg+Loc:  ááhust
    ákku+N+Sg+Com:  áhhoin
    ákku+N+Sg+Abe:  áhuttáá
    ákku+N+Ess:  ákkun
    ákku+N+Pl+Nom:  ááhuh
    ákku+N+Pl+Gen: [ááhui, áhui]
    ákku+N+Pl+Acc:  ááhuid
    ákku+N+Pl+Ill:  áhhoid
    ákku+N+Pl+Loc:  ááhuin
    ákku+N+Pl+Com:  áhuiguin
    ákku+N+Pl+Abe:  áhuittáá

  Noun - kákku:
    kákku+N+Sg+Nom:  kákku
    kákku+N+Sg+Gen:  kááhu
    kákku+N+Sg+Ill:  káákun
    kákku+N+Sg+Loc:  kááhust
    kákku+N+Sg+Com:  káhhoin
    kákku+N+Sg+Abe:  káhuttáá
    kákku+N+Ess:  kákkun
    kákku+N+Pl+Nom:  kááhuh
    kákku+N+Pl+Gen: [kááhui, káhui]
    kákku+N+Pl+Acc:  kááhuid
    kákku+N+Pl+Ill:  káhhoid
    kákku+N+Pl+Loc:  kááhuin
    kákku+N+Pl+Com:  káhuiguin
    kákku+N+Pl+Abe:  káhuittáá
